Maryland, session 2026, SB0423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
Title 15. Research Facilities [that] AND TESTING FACILITIES THAT Use [Dogs or Cats]
ANIMALS.
15–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD” MEANS A TEST METHOD,
INCLUDING A NEW OR REVISED METHOD, THAT:
(I) DOES NOT USE LIVE VERTEBRATE ANIMALS;
(II) PRODUCES INFORMATION OF EQUIVALENT OR BETTER
SCIENTIFIC QUALITY AND RELEVANCE COMPARED TO TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST
METHODS; AND
(III) HAS BEEN IDENTIFIED AND ACCEPTED FOR USE BY THE
FEDERAL AGENCY OR PROGRAM WITHIN THE FEDERAL AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR
REGULATING THE SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR ACTIVITY FOR WHICH THE TEST IS BEING
CONDUCTED.
(2) “ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD” INCLUDES:
(I) COMPUTATIONAL TOXICOLOGY AND BIOINFORMATICS;
(II) HIGH–THROUGHPUT SCREENING METHODS;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 230
(III) TESTING CATEGORIES OF CHEMICAL SUBSTANCES;
(IV) TIERED TESTING METHODS;
(V) IN VITRO STUDIES; AND
(VI) SYSTEMS BIOLOGY.
(C) (1) “BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH” MEANS:
(I) THE INVESTIGATION OF THE BIOLOGICAL PROCESSES AND
CAUSES OF DISEASE; OR
(II) RESEARCH CONDUCTED TO INCREASE FUNDAMENTAL
SCIENTIFIC KNOWLEDGE AND EXPAND THE UNDERSTANDING OF HOW PROCESSES IN
LIVING ORGANISMS DEVELOP AND FUNCTION.
(2) “BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH” DOES NOT INCLUDE TESTING DONE TO
ASSESS THE SAFETY OR EFFICACY OF:
(I) CHEMICAL SUBSTANCES;
(II) INGREDIENTS;
(III) DRUGS;
(IV) VACCINES;
(V) PRODUCTS; OR
(VI) PRODUCT FORMULATIONS.
(D) (C) “CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE” MEANS ANY ORGANIC OR INORGANIC
SUBSTANCE INCLUDING:
(1) A DRUG, AS DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. § 321(G);
(2) (1) A PESTICIDE, AS DEFINED IN 7 U.S.C. § 136(U);
(3) (2) A CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE, AS DEFINED IN 15 U.S.C. §
2602(2); AND
– 3 –

Ch. 230 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) (3) A FOOD ADDITIVE, AS DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. § 321(S).
(D) (1) “MEDICAL RESEARCH” MEANS RESEARCH RELATED TO:
(I) THE CAUSES, DIAGNOSIS, TREATMENT, CONTROL, OR
PREVENTION OF PHYSICAL OR MENTAL DISEASES OR IMPAIRMENT IN HUMANS OR
ANIMALS; OR
(II) THE DEVELOPMENT OF BIOMEDICAL PRODUCTS, MEDICAL
DEVICES, OR DRUGS AS DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. § 321(G).
(2) “MEDICAL RESEARCH” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE TESTING OF AN
INGREDIENT THAT WAS FORMERLY USED AS A DRUG AND THAT IS NOW PROPOSED
FOR USE IN A PRODUCT OTHER THAN A BIOMEDICAL PRODUCT, MEDICAL DEVICE,
OR DRUG.
(E) (1) “RESEARCH FACILITY” MEANS ANY FACILITY IN THE STATE THAT
USES LIVE VERTEBRATE ANIMALS FOR RESEARCH, EDUCATION, OR
EXPERIMENTATION.
(2) “RESEARCH FACILITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PARTNERSHIP, A
CORPORATION, AN ASSOCIATION, AN INSTITUTION, AN ORGANIZATION, OR ANY
OTHER ENTITY IN THE STATE THAT PROVIDES ONLY BENEFICIAL SERVICES TO AN
ANIMAL SUCH AS SPAYING AND NEUTERING.
(F) (1) “TESTING FACILITY” MEANS A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE
PARTNERSHIP, CORPORATION, ASSOCIATION, ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER
ENTITY IN THE STATE THAT USES LIVE VERTEBRATE ANIMALS FOR THE TESTING OF:
(I) CHEMICAL SUBSTANCES;
(II) INGREDIENTS;
(III) DRUGS;
(IV) VACCINES;
(V) (III) PRODUCTS; OR
(VI) (IV) PRODUCT FORMULATIONS.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 230
(2) “TESTING FACILITY” INCLUDES A PARTNERSHIP, A
CORPORATION, AN ASSOCIATION, AN ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY IN THE
STATE THAT IS OWNED, LEASED, OR OPERATED BY A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ENTITY.
(3) “TESTING FACILITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A PARTNERSHIP, A CORPORATION, AN ASSOCIATION, AN
INSTITUTION, AN ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY IN THE STATE THAT
PROVIDES ONLY BENEFICIAL SERVICES TO AN ANIMAL SUCH AS SPAYING AND
NEUTERING; OR
(II) A SCHOOL OR AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(G) “TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD” MEANS A PROCESS, AN
EXPERIMENT, OR A PROCEDURE THAT:
(1) USES LIVE VERTEBRATE ANIMALS TO OBTAIN INFORMATION ON
THE CHARACTERISTICS OF A CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE, AN INGREDIENT, A DRUG, A
VACCINE, A PRODUCT FORMULATION, OR A PRODUCT; AND
(2) GENERATES INFORMATION REGARDING THE ABILITY OF THE
CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE, INGREDIENT, DRUG, VACCINE, PRODUCT FORMULATION, OR
PRODUCT TO PRODUCE A SPECIFIC BIOLOGICAL EFFECT UNDER SPECIFIED
CONDITIONS.
15–102.
(A) A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY MAY NOT USE A DOG OR
CAT THAT HAS UNDERGONE A DEVOCALIZATION SURGERY FOR RESEARCH OR
TESTING PURPOSES.
(B) A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY MAY NOT PERFORM A
DEVOCALIZATION SURGERY ON A DOG OR CAT.
(C) A DOG OR CAT AT A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY MAY BE
EUTHANIZED ONLY BY A LETHAL INJECTION OF SODIUM PENTOBARBITAL
ADMINISTERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MOST CURRENT AMERICAN
VETERINARY MEDICAL ASSOCIATION GUIDELINES FOR THE EUTHANASIA OF
ANIMALS:
(1) BY A VETERINARIAN LICENSED IN THE STATE; OR
– 5 –

Ch. 230 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) UNDER THE DIRECT OR INDIRECT SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED
VETERINARIAN LICENSED IN THE STATE.
15–103.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO BIOMEDICAL MEDICAL RESEARCH.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A TESTING
FACILITY MAY NOT USE A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD IF THE AGENCY
RESPONSIBLE FOR REGULATING THE SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR ACTIVITY FOR WHICH
A TEST METHOD IS BEING USED HAS:
(I) APPROVED AN ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD; OR
(II) MADE AVAILABLE TO OR GRANTED THE TESTING FACILITY
A WAIVER FROM USING A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD.
(2) IF THERE IS NO ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD AVAILABLE OR
WAIVER MADE AVAILABLE OR GRANTED, A TESTING FACILITY MAY USE A
TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD IF THE TESTING FACILITY USES THE FEWEST
NUMBER OF ANIMALS POSSIBLE AND MINIMIZES THE LEVEL OF PAIN, SUFFERING,
AND STRESS OF AN ANIMAL USED FOR TESTING.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT:
(I) THE USE OF A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD TO
COMPLY WITH FEDERAL OR STATE REQUIREMENTS IF THE APPROPRIATE FEDERAL
OR STATE AGENCY HAS APPROVED THE USE OF AN ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD BUT
DETERMINED THAT THE ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD DOES NOT ENSURE THE
HEALTH OR SAFETY OF THE PUBLIC OR THE ENVIRONMENT; OR
(II) THE CONTINUED USE OF A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST
METHOD THAT:
1. WAS INITIATED:
A. BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026; OR
B. WITHIN 180 DAYS AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026,
FOLLOWING AGENCY APPROVAL OF AN ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD OR STRATEGY;
AND
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 230
2. IS USED ONLY TO COMPLETE THE TEST FOR WHICH IT
WAS STARTED.
[15–101.] 15–104.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Animal rescue organization” includes:
(i) A nonprofit organization incorporated for the purpose of rescuing
animals in need and finding permanent adoptive homes for the animals; and
(ii) A government–operated animal control unit that provides
animals for adoption.
(3) [“Research facility” includes:
(i) A higher education research facility;
(ii) A scientific research facility;
(iii) A medical research facility; and
(iv) A product testing facility.
(4)] “Scientific research purposes” includes:
(i) Investigation;
(ii) Experimentation;
(iii) Instruction; and
(iv) Testing.
(b) This section applies to a dog or cat that, in the determination of an attending
veterinarian, is suitable for adoption.
(c) A research facility OR TESTING FACILITY located in the State in which dogs
or cats are used for scientific research purposes shall take reasonable steps to provide for
the adoption of a dog or cat that, in the determination of the research facility OR TESTING
FACILITY, is no longer needed for scientific research purposes by:
(1) Establishing a private placement process to provide for the adoption of
a dog or cat;
– 7 –

Ch. 230 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Establishing a list of animal rescue organizations that are approved by
the research facility OR TESTING FACILITY and are willing to take a dog or cat from the
research facility OR TESTING FACILITY; and
(3) Offering the dog or cat to the animal rescue organizations identified in
the list established under item (2) of this subsection if the research facility OR TESTING
FACILITY is unable to place the dog or cat through its private placement process.
(d) A research facility OR TESTING FACILITY may enter into a collaborative
agreement with an animal rescue organization for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of this section.
15–105.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 DECEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH JANUARY
31 DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, EACH TESTING FACILITY SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
SECRETARY THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION REGARDING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD FISCAL YEAR:
(1) THE NUMBER OF EACH SPECIES OF ANIMALS OWNED AND USED BY
THE TESTING FACILITY;
(2) THE NUMBER OF DOGS OR CATS RELEASED TO ANIMAL RESCUE
ORGANIZATIONS UNDER § 15–104 OF THIS TITLE AND THE NAMES OF THE ANIMAL
RESCUE ORGANIZATIONS TO WHICH THE DOGS OR CATS WERE RELEASED;
(3) THE TYPE AND NUMBER OF ALTERNATIVE TEST METHODS AND
TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHODS USED;
(4) THE NUMBER OF TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD WAIVERS
USED; AND
(5) THE PURPOSE OF ANY TESTS CONDUCTED USING ALTERNATIVE
TEST METHODS OR TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHODS.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 DECEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH JANUARY
31 DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, EACH RESEARCH FACILITY USING OR KEEPING DOGS
OR CATS SHALL SUBMIT TO THE SECRETARY, FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
12–MONTH PERIOD FISCAL YEAR, THE NUMBER OF DOGS OR CATS RELEASED TO
ANIMAL RESCUE ORGANIZATIONS UNDER § 15–104 OF THIS TITLE AND THE NAMES
OF THE ANIMAL RESCUE ORGANIZATIONS TO WHICH THE DOGS OR CATS WERE
RELEASED.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 230
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) PREPARE AN ANNUAL REPORT AGGREGATING THE INFORMATION
SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION IN AN ANONYMIZED MANNER; AND
(2) POST THE ANNUAL REPORT ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
(D) A REPORT MADE TO THE SECRETARY UNDER THIS SECTION IS NOT
SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER THE MARYLAND PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT.
15–106.
A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY THAT VIOLATES THIS TITLE IS
SUBJECT TO:
(1) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000; AND
(2) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $5,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 9 –